Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Oregon Business Development Department,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General  Fund, the following amounts, for
the following purposes:
(1) Oregon Arts Commission .......... $ 3,766,602
(2) Business, innovation and
trade.......................................... $ 3,556,629
(3) Debt service .............................. $ 40,625,560
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the  Oregon Business Devel-
opment Department, for the following purposes:
(1) Business, innovation
and trade................................... $ 11,911,165
(2) Infrastructure
Finance Authority ..................... $203,001,120
(3) Operations................................. $ 1,912,085
(4) Arts and Cultural Trust ........... $ 10,418,444
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Economic  De-
velopment Fund to the Oregon Business Development Department,  for the following pur-
poses:
(1) Business, innovation
and trade...................................  $ 56,348,242
(2) Operations.................................  $ 7,302,901
(3) Oregon Film and Video Office .. $ 1,207,545
(4) Lottery bond debt service ......... $ 51,171,865
(5) Infrastructure
Finance Authority ..................... $ 1,603,463
Enrolled House Bill 5025 (HB 5025-A) Page 1
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from  federal funds collected or received by the Oregon Business Development
Department, for the following purposes:
(1) Business, innovation
and trade................................... $ 4,861,653
(2) Infrastructure Finance
Authority .................................. $ 33,708,202
(3) Operations................................. $ 199,620
(4) Arts ........................................... $ 1,961,360
SECTION 5. For the biennium beginning July  1, 2017, expenditures by the Oregon Busi-
ness Development Department are not limited for:
(1) Loans from the following funds:
(a) Oregon  Business Development Fund (ORS 285B.092), Oregon Entrepreneurial De-
velopment Loan Fund (ORS  285B.758), Credit Enhancement Fund (ORS 285B.215) and
Brownfields Redevelopment Fund (ORS 285A.188).
(b) Special Public Works Fund  (ORS 285B.455), Water Fund (ORS 285B.563), Marine
Navigation Improvement Fund (ORS 777.267), Oregon Port Revolving Fund  (ORS 285A.708)
and Safe Drinking Water Revolving Loan Fund (ORS 285A.213).
(2) Debt service, excluding  debt service on lottery revenue bonds and general obligation
bonds.
SECTION 6.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Passed by House June 30, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate July 5, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5025 (HB 5025-A) Page 2